Hawaii statutes.
§128D-15 Employee protection.
No person shall terminate from employment or in any other way discriminate
against, or cause to be eliminated from employment or discriminated against,
any person on the grounds that the person has provided information to the
State, filed, instituted, or caused to be filed or instituted any proceeding
under this chapter, or has testified or is about to testify in any proceeding
resulting from the administration or enforcement of this chapter, or has
refused to act because of the good faith belief that one would be acting in
violation of this chapter. No criminal penalty shall be imposed under this
chapter upon any person for action taken in the course and scope of the
person's employment if the person does not possess managerial or supervisory
authority. [L 1990, c 298, pt of §17; am L 1991, c 280, §14; gen ch 2011]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next